csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_Cnj_Cw.yaml
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mizhogosiiwaanen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mizhogowaanen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: mizhosiiwegwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: mizhowegwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: mizhosiiwanen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: mizhowanen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: mizhosiiwaagwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: mizhowaagwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: mizhosiigwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: mizhogwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg: mizhogoosiiwaanen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg: mizhogoowaanen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mizhogosiwaan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mizhogoyaan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: mizhosiweg
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: mizhoyeg
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: mizhosiwan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: mizhoyan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: mizhosigwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: mizhowaad
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: mizhosig
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: mizhod
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg: mizhogoosiwaan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: mizhogooyaan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mizhogosiwaambaan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mizhogoyaambaan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: mizhosiwegiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: mizhoyegiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: mizhosiwamban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: mizhoyamban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: mizhosigwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: mizhowaapan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: mizhosigoban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: mizhopan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg: mizhogoosiwaambaan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg: mizhogooyaambaan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mizhogosiiwegwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mizhogowegwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: mizhosinowagoogwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: mizhonagoogwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: mizhogoosiiwegwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: mizhogoowegwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: mizhogoosiiwanen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: mizhogoowanen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl: mizhosiinogwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl: mizhonogwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl: mizhogoosiiwegwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl: mizhogoowegwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mizhogosiweg
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mizhogoyeg
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: mizhosinowagog
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: mizhonagog
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: mizhosinowegwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: mizhonegwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: mizhosinoweg
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: mizhoneg
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl: mizhogosiweg
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl: mizhogooyeg
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl: mizhogoosiweg
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl: mizhogooyeg
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mizhogosiwegiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mizhogoyegiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: mizhosinowagoogoban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: mizhonagoogoban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: mizhogoosiwegiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: mizhogooyegiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: mizhogoosiwamban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: mizhogooyamban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl: mizhosinokwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl: mizhokwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl: mizhogoosiwegiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl: mizhogooyegiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mizhogosiiwanen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mizhogowanen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: mizhosiinowaanen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: mizhonowaanen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: mizhosiinowegwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: mizhonowegwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: mizhosiinowegwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: mizhonowegwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg: mizhosiinogwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg: mizhonogwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg: mizhogoosiiwanen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg: mizhogoowanen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mizhogosiwan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mizhogoyan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: mizhosinowaan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: mizhonaan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: mizhosinokwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: mizhokwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: mizhosinok
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: mizhok
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg: mizhogoosiwan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg: mizhogooyan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg: mizhogoosiwan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg: mizhogooyan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mizhogosiwamban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mizhogoyamban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: mizhosinowaambaan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: mizhonaambaan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: mizhosinowegwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: mizhonegwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: mizhosinowegiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: mizhonegiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg: mizhosinokiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg: mizhokiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg: mizhogoosiwamban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg: mizhogooyamban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mizhogosiiwaagwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mizhogowaagwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: mizhwaasiwaawagwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: mizhwaawagwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: mizhwaasiwaawegwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: mizhwaawegwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: mizhwaasiwaawadwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: mizhwaawadwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mizhogosiiwaagwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mizhogowaagwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: mizhwaasiwaawangidwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: mizhwaawangidwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: mizhwaasiwaawangwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: mizhwaawangwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx: mizhwaasiwaawindwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx: mizhwaawindwaawen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mizhogosigwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mizhogowaad
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: mizhwaasiwagwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: mizhwagwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: mizhwaasiwegwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: mizhwegwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: mizhwaasiwadwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: mizhwadwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mizhogosigwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mizhogowaad
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: mizhwaasiwangidwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: mizhwangidwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: mizhwaasiwangwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: mizhwangwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx: mizhwaasiwindwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx: mizhondwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mizhogosigwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mizhogowaapan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: mizhwaasiwagwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: mizhwagwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: mizhwaasiwegwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: mizhwegwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: mizhwaasiwadwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: mizhwadwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mizhogosigwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mizhogowaapan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: mizhwaasiwangidwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: mizhwangidwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: mizhwaasiwangwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: mizhwangwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx: mizhwaasiwindwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx: mizhondwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhogosiinigwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhogonigwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaasiwaawagen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaawagen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaasiwaawegwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaawegwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaasiwaawaden
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaawaden
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhwaasiwaawaagwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhwaawaagwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhwaasiigwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhwaagwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaasiwaawangiden
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaawangiden
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaasiwaawangen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaawangen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaasiwaawinden
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaawinden
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhogosinig
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhogonid
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaasiwag
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomag
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaasiweg
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomeg
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaasiwad
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomad
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhwaasigwaa
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhwaawaad
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhwaasig
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhwaad
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaasiwangid
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomangid
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaasiwang
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomang
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaasiwind
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomind
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhogosinigoban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhogonipan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaasiwagiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomagiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaasiwegiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomegiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaasiwadiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomadiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhwaasigwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhwaawaapan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhwaasigoban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhwaapan
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaasiwangidiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomangidiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaasiwangiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomangiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomaasiwindiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mizhomindiban
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mizhogosiigwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mizhogogwen
     mizho+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: mizhwaasiwaawagen
